District of Columbia statutes.
7-2033.01

Transfers of personnel, property, and funds from Department of Health to Office of the State Superintendent of Education; continuation.

(a)

All positions, personnel, property, records, and unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, and other funds available or to be made available to the Department of Health that support the functions related to the licensure of child-care programs in the Early Care and Education Administration and the Early Intervention Program shall be transferred to the Office of the State Superintendent of Education, established by § 38-2601, within 60 days of July 18, 2008.

(b)

All rules, orders, obligations, determinations, grants, contracts, licenses, and agreements of the Department of Health, the Department of Human Services, the Board of Education, or the District of Columbia Public Schools relating to the functions transferred to the Office of the State Superintendent of Education pursuant to subsection (a) of this section shall remain in effect according to their terms until lawfully amended, repealed, or modified.

History

Apr. 13, 1999, D.C. Law 12-215, § 4a
as added July 18, 2008, D.C. Law 17-202, § 603(c), 55 DCR 6297
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-171, § 51, 59 DCR 6190

Effect of Amendments

The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-171 made a technical correction to D.C. Law 17-202, § 603(c), which did not affect this section as codified.